North Carolina statutes. Chapter 162A. Water and Sewer Systems.
Article 5. Metropolitan Sewerage Districts.
§ 162A-68.5.
Alternate procedure for inclusion of additional political subdivision.

Notwithstanding

G.S. 162A-67

and

G.S. 162A-68

, any time subsequent to the creation of a district, the district shall be expanded in accordance with this section to include territory of a requesting county if the governing board of the county submits a resolution requesting inclusion in the district and the county meets all of the following criteria:

The county is contracting with the district for bulk service.

The district has installed a sewage disposal system, sewerage system, sewers, or any portion thereof, in that county.

The district serves customers in that county as of the date of the resolution.

Upon receipt of a resolution described in subsection (a) of this section, the district board shall send to the Environmental Management Commission and the requesting county all of the following:

A map or maps of the district showing each of the following:

The present and proposed new boundaries of the district.

The existing sewage disposal system, sewerage system, and sewers.

Any proposed extension of the sewage disposal system, sewerage system, sewer, including any sewer interceptors and outfalls.

A description of any proposed extension of sewerage services to the requesting county, which shall address all of the following:

Extension of sewerage service to the requesting county on substantially the same basis and in the same manner as such services are provided within the rest of the district prior to inclusion of the new territory.

A proposed time schedule for extension of sewerage service to the requesting county.

The estimated cost of extension of sewerage service to the requesting county; the method by which the district board proposes to finance the extension; the outstanding existing indebtedness of the district, if any; and the valuation of assessable property within the district and within the requesting county.

An analysis of the inclusion of the territory in the district.

The Environmental Management Commission shall review the documents submitted under subsection (b) of this section and shall, in conjunction with the requesting county, set a time and place within the requesting county for a public hearing. The chair of the governing body of the requesting county shall give prior notice of such hearing by posting a notice at the courthouse door of the requesting county at least 30 days prior to the hearing and also by publication at least once a week for four successive weeks in a newspaper or newspapers having general circulation in the district and in the requesting county, the first publication to be at least 30 days prior to such public hearing.

If, after the public hearing, the Environmental Management Commission determines that the inclusion of the territory will not adversely affect customer service in the district and will preserve and promote the public health and welfare of the district, the Environmental Management Commission shall adopt a resolution expanding and defining the boundaries of the district to include the territory in the district. Such resolution shall state an effective date of the inclusion of the territory in the district.

Any action or proceeding in any court to set aside a resolution of the Environmental Management Commission, or to obtain any other relief upon the ground that such resolution or any proceeding or action taken with respect to the inclusion of the requesting county within the district is invalid, must be commenced within 30 days after the effective date of the resolution adopted by the Environmental Management Commission. After the expiration of such period of limitation, no right of action or defense founded upon the invalidity of the resolution or the inclusion of the requesting county in the district shall be asserted, nor shall the validity of the resolution or the inclusion of the requesting county be open to question in any court upon any ground whatever, except in an action or proceeding commenced within such period.

Any territory of the requesting county included within an existing district by resolution of the Environmental Management Commission shall be subject to all debts of the district.

Upon inclusion in the district, the district board shall be expanded by two members, who shall be qualified registered voters residing in the territory added to the district and appointed by the governing body of the requesting county. The terms of office of the members appointed under this subsection may be varied for a period not to exceed six months from the terms provided for in

G.S. 162A-67

so that the appointment of successors to such members may more nearly coincide with the appointment of successors to members of the existing district board. All successor members shall be appointed for the terms provided for in

G.S. 162A-67

.

G.S. 162A-67(a)(4) and

G.S. 162A-68

shall not apply to any expansion under this section.

History.

2019-127, s. 1.

§ 162A-69.
Powers generally; fiscal year.

Each district shall be deemed to be a public body and body politic and corporate exercising public and essential governmental functions to provide for the preservation and promotion of the public health and welfare, and each district is hereby authorized and empowered:

To adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business not in conflict with this or other law;

To adopt an official seal and alter the same at pleasure;

To maintain an office at such place or places in the district as it may designate;

To sue and be sued in its own name, plead and be impleaded;

To acquire, lease as lessor or lessee, construct, reconstruct, improve, extend, enlarge, equip, repair, maintain and operate any sewerage system or part thereof within or without the district; provided, however, that no such sewerage system or part thereof shall be located in any city, town or incorporated village outside the district except with the consent of the governing body thereof, and each such governing body is hereby authorized to grant such consent;

To issue general obligation bonds and revenue bonds of the district as hereinafter provided to pay the cost of a sewerage system or systems;

To issue general obligation refunding bonds and revenue refunding bonds of the district as hereinafter provided;

To fix and revise from time to time and to collect rents, rates, fees and other charges for the use of or for the services and facilities furnished by any sewerage system;

(8a)

To impose and require system development fees only in accordance with Article 8 of this Chapter.

To cause taxes to be levied and collected upon all taxable property within the district sufficient to meet the obligations of the district, to pay the cost of maintaining, repairing and operating any sewerage system or systems, and to pay all obligations incurred by the district in the performance of its lawful undertakings and functions;

To acquire in the name of the district, either within or without the corporate limits of the district, by gift, purchase or the exercise of the right of eminent domain, which right shall be exercised in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 40A of the General Statutes of North Carolina, any improved or unimproved lands or rights in land, and to acquire such personal property, as it may deem necessary in connection with the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement, extension, enlargement, repair, equipment, maintenance or operation of any sewerage system, and to hold and dispose of all real and personal property under its control;

To make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers under this Article, including a trust agreement or trust agreements securing any revenue bonds issued hereunder;

(11a)

To pledge a security interest in accordance with

G.S. 160A-20

;

To employ such consulting and other engineers, superintendents, managers, construction and financial experts, accountants, attorneys, employees and agents as may, in the judgment of the district board be deemed necessary, and to fix their compensation; provided, however, that the provisions of

G.S. 159-20

shall be complied with to the extent that the same shall be applicable;

To receive and accept from the United States of America or the State of North Carolina or any agency or instrumentality thereof loans, grants, advances or contributions for or in aid of the planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement, extension, enlargement, repair, equipment, maintenance or operation of any sewerage system or systems, to agree to such reasonable conditions or requirements as may be imposed, and to receive and accept contributions from any source of either money, property, labor or other things of value, to be held, used and applied only for the purposes for which such loans, grants, advances or contributions may be made;

(13a)

To adopt ordinances to regulate and control the discharge of sewage into any sewerage system owned or operated by the district. Prior to the adoption of any ordinance or any amendment to any ordinance the district shall first pass a declaration of intent to adopt such ordinance or amendment. The declaration of intent shall describe the ordinance or amendment which it is proposed that the district adopt. The declaration of intent shall be submitted to each governing body for review and comment. The district shall take into consideration any comment and suggestions with respect to the proposed ordinance or amendment offered by any governing body and may modify such proposed ordinance or amendment to reflect comment and suggestions offered by any governing body. Thereafter, the district shall be authorized to adopt such ordinance or any amendment to it at any time after 60 days following the submission of the declaration of intent to each governing body;

(13b)

To require the owners of improved property located within the district so as to be served by a sewer collection line owned or leased and operated by the district to connect their premises with the sewer line, and fix charges for these connections; and

(13c)

To exercise any power of a Metropolitan Water District under Article 4 of this Chapter not set forth in this section; [and]

To do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers granted by this Article.

Each district shall keep its accounts on the basis of a fiscal year commencing on the first day of July and ending on the thirtieth day of June of the following year.

History.

1961, c. 795, s. 6; 1973, c. 822, s. 4; 1981, c. 919, s. 32; 1983, c. 333, s. 3; 1987, c. 396, ss. 1-3; 2012-203, s. 4; 2015-207, s. 5(c); 2017-138, s. 7(a).

§ 162A-70.
Bonds and notes authorized.

A metropolitan sewerage district shall have power from time to time to issue bonds and notes under the Local Government Finance Act.

History.

1961, c. 795, s. 7; 1971, c. 780, s. 30; 1973, c. 822, s. 4.

§ 162A-71.
Determination of tax rate by district board; levy and collection of tax; remittance and deposit of funds.

After each assessment for taxes following the creation of the district, the board or boards of commissioners shall file with the district board the valuation of assessable property within the district. The district board shall then determine the amount of funds to be raised by taxation for the ensuing year in excess of available funds to provide for the payment of interest on and the principal of all outstanding general obligation bonds as the same shall become due and payable, to pay the cost of maintaining, repairing and operating any sewerage system or systems, and to pay all obligations incurred by the district in the performance of its lawful undertakings and functions.

The district board shall determine the number of cents per one hundred dollars ($100.00) necessary to raise said amount and certify such rate to the board or boards of commissioners. The board or boards of commissioners shall include the number of cents per one hundred dollars ($100.00) certified by the district board in its next annual levy against all taxable property within the district, which tax shall be collected as other county taxes are collected, and every month the amount of tax so collected shall be remitted to the district board and deposited by the district board in a separate account in a bank in the State of North Carolina. Such levy may include an amount for reimbursing the county for the additional cost to the county of levying and collecting such taxes, pursuant to such formula as may be agreed upon by the district board and the board or boards of commissioners, to be deducted from the collections and stated with each remittance to the district board. The officer or officers having charge or custody of the funds of the district shall require said bank to furnish security for protection of such deposits as provided in

G.S. 159-28

and, after June 30, 1973,

G.S. 159-31

.

History.

1961, c. 795, s. 15; 1973, c. 512, s. 4; c. 822, s. 4.

§ 162A-72.
Rates and charges for services.

The district board may fix, and may revise from time to time, rents, rates, fees and other charges for the use of and for the services furnished or to be furnished by any sewerage system. Such rents, rates, fees and charges shall not be subject to supervision or regulation by any bureau, board, commission, or other agency of the State or of any political subdivision. Any such rents, rates, fees and charges pledged to the payment of revenue bonds of the district shall be fixed and revised so that the revenues of the sewerage system, together with any other available funds, shall be sufficient at all times to pay the cost of maintaining, repairing and operating the sewerage system the revenues of which are pledged to the payment of such revenue bonds, including reserves for such purposes, and to pay the interest on and the principal of such revenue bonds as the same shall become due and payable and to provide reserves therefor. If any such rents, rates, fees and charges are pledged to the payment of any general obligation bonds issued under this Article, such rents, rates, fees and charges shall be fixed and revised so as to comply with the requirements of such pledge. The district board may provide methods for collection of such rents, rates, fees and charges and measures for enforcement of collection thereof, including penalties and the denial or discontinuance of service.

The district board may require system development fees only in accordance with Article 8 of this Chapter.

History.

1961, c. 795, s. 19; 1973, c. 822, s. 4; 2017-138, s. 7(b).

§ 162A-73.
Authority of governing bodies of political subdivisions.

The governing body of any political subdivision is hereby authorized and empowered:

Subject to the approval of the Local Government Commission, to transfer jurisdiction over, and to lease, lend, sell, grant or convey to a district, upon such terms and conditions as the governing body of such political subdivision may agree upon with the district board, the whole or any part of any existing sewerage system or systems or such real or personal property as may be necessary or useful in connection with the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement, extension, enlargement, equipment, repair, maintenance or operation of any sewerage system by the district, including public roads and other property already devoted to public use;

To make and enter into contracts or agreements with a district, upon such terms and conditions and for such periods as such governing body and the district board may determine:

For the collection, treatment or disposal of sewage;

For the collecting by such political subdivision or by the district of rents, rates, fees or charges for the services and facilities provided to or for such political subdivision or its inhabitants by any sewerage system, and for the enforcement of collection of such rents, rates, fees and charges; and

For the imposition of penalties, including the shutting off of the supply of water furnished by any water system owned or operated by such political subdivision, in the event that the owner, tenant or occupant of any premises utilizing such water shall fail to pay any such rents, rates, fees or charges;

To fix, and revise from time to time, rents, rates, fees and other charges for the services furnished or to be furnished by a sewerage system under any contract between the district and such political subdivision, and to pledge all or any part of the proceeds of such rents, rates, fees and charges to the payment of any obligation of such political subdivision to the district under such contract;

To pay any obligation of such political subdivision to the district under such contract from any available funds of the political subdivision and to levy and collect a tax ad valorem for the making of any such payment; and

In its discretion or if required by law, to submit to its qualified electors under the election laws applicable to such political subdivision any contract or agreement which such governing body is authorized to make and enter into with the district under the provisions of this Article.Any such election upon a contract or agreement may, at the discretion of the governing body, be called and held under the election laws applicable to the issuance of bonds by such political subdivision.

History.

1961, c. 795, s. 23; 1973, c. 822, s. 4.

§ 162A-74.
Rights-of-way and easements in streets and highways.

A right-of-way or easement in, along, or across any State highway system, road, or street, and along or across any city or town street within a district is hereby granted to a district in case such right-of-way is found by the district board to be necessary or convenient for carrying out any of the work of the district. Any work done in, along, or across any State highway system, road, street, or property shall be done in accordance with the rules and regulations and any reasonable requirements of the Department of Transportation, and any work done in, along, or across any municipal street or property shall be done in accordance with any reasonable requirements of the municipal governing body.

History.

1961, c. 795, s. 24; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; c. 822, s. 4; 1977, c. 464, s. 34.

§ 162A-75.
Submission of preliminary plans to planning groups; cooperation with planning agencies.

Prior to the time final plans are made for the location and construction of any sewerage system, the district board shall present preliminary plans for such improvement to the county, municipal or regional planning board for their consideration, if such facility is to be located within the planning jurisdiction of any such county, municipal or regional planning group. The district board shall make every effort to cooperate with the planning agency, if any, in the location and construction of a proposed facility authorized under this Article. Any district board created under the authority of this Article is hereby directed, wherever possible, to coordinate its plans for the construction of sewerage system improvements with the overall plans for the development of the planning area, if such district is located wholly or in part within a county, municipal or regional planning area; provided, however, that the approval of any such county, municipal or regional planning board as to any such plan of the district shall not be required.

History.

1961, c. 795, s. 25; 1973, c. 822, s. 4.

§ 162A-76.
Water system acting as billing and collecting agent for district; furnishing meter readings.

The owner or operator, including any political subdivision, of a water system supplying water to the owners, lessees or tenants of real property which is or will be served by any sewerage system owned or operated by a district is authorized to act as the billing and collecting agent of the district for any rents, rates, fees or charges imposed by the district for the services and facilities provided by such sewerage system, and such district is authorized to arrange with such owner or operator to act as the billing and collecting agent of the district for such purpose. Any such owner or operator shall, if requested by a district, furnish to the district copies of such regular periodic meter reading and water consumption records and other pertinent data as the district may require to do its own billing and collecting. The district shall pay to such owner or operator the reasonable additional expenses incurred by such owner or operator in rendering such services to the district.

History.

1961, c. 795, s. 26; 1973, c. 822, s. 4.

§ 162A-77.
District may assume sewerage system indebtedness of political subdivision; approval of voters; actions founded upon invalidity of election; tax to pay assumed indebtedness.

A district may assume all outstanding indebtedness of any political subdivision in the district lawfully incurred for paying all or any part of the cost of a sewerage system, subject to approval thereof by a majority of the qualified voters of the district voting at an election thereon. Any such election shall be called and held in accordance with the provisions of the Local Government Finance Act, insofar as the same may be made applicable, and the returns of such election shall be canvassed and a statement of the result thereof prepared, recorded and published as provided in the Local Government Finance Act. No right of action or defense founded upon the invalidity of the election shall be asserted nor shall the validity of the election be open to question in any court upon any ground whatever, except in an action or proceeding commenced within 30 days after the publication of such statement of result. In the event that any such indebtedness of a political subdivision is assumed by the district, there shall be annually levied and collected a tax ad valorem upon all the taxable property in the district sufficient to pay such assumed indebtedness and the interest thereon as the same become due and payable; provided, however, that such tax may be reduced by the amount of other moneys actually available for such purpose. Such tax shall be determined, levied and collected in the manner provided by

G.S. 162A-71

and subject to the provisions of said section.

Nothing herein shall prevent any political subdivision from levying taxes to provide for the payment of its debt service requirements as to indebtedness incurred for paying all or any part of the cost of a sewerage system if such debt service requirements shall not have been otherwise provided for.

History.

1961, c. 795, s. 27; 1973, c. 512, s. 5; c. 822, s. 4.

§ 162A-77.1.
Special election upon the question of the merger of metropolitan sewerage districts into cities or towns.

Any district lying entirely within the corporate limits of a city or town may be merged into such city or town in accordance with the provisions of this section.

The governing body of a city or town, with the approval of the district board, shall call and conduct a special election within such city or town on the question of the merger of the district into the city or town. A vote in favor of such merger shall constitute a vote for such city or town to assume the obligations of the district. Such special election may be called and conducted by the governing body of a city or town upon its own motion after passage of a resolution of the district board requesting or approving the special election. Any special election shall be conducted in accordance with

G.S. 163-287

.

A new registration of voters shall not be required for the special election. The special election shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of law applicable to regular elections in the city or town.

If a majority of the votes are in favor of the merger, then:

All property, real and personal and mixed, including accounts receivable, belonging to such district shall vest in, belong to, and be the property of, such city or town. All district boards are hereby authorized to take such actions and to execute such documents as will carry into effect the provisions and the intent of this section.

All judgments, liens, rights of liens, and causes of action of any nature in favor of such district shall vest in and remain and inure to the benefit of such city or town.

All taxes, assessments, sewer charges, and any other debts, charges or fees, owing to such district shall be owed to and collected by such city or town.

All actions, suits and proceedings pending against, or having been instituted by, such district shall not be abated by this section or by the merger herein provided for, but all such actions, suits, and proceedings shall be continued and completed in the same manner as if merger had not occurred, and such city or town shall be a party to all such actions, suits, and proceedings in the place and stead of the district and shall pay or cause to be paid any judgments rendered against the district in any such actions, suits, or proceedings. No new process need be served in any such action, suit, or proceeding.

All obligations of the district, including outstanding indebtedness, shall be assumed by such city or town, and all such obligations and outstanding indebtedness shall constitute obligations and indebtedness of such city or town, and the full faith and credit of such city or town shall be deemed to be pledged for the punctual payment of the principal of and the interest on any general obligation bonds or bond anticipation notes of such district, and all the taxable property within such city or town, as well as that formerly located within the district, shall be and remain subject to taxation for such payment.

All ordinances, rules, regulations, and policies of such district shall continue in full force and effect until repealed or amended by the governing body of such city or town.

Such district shall be abolished, and shall no longer be constituted a public body or a body politic and corporate, except for the purposes of carrying into effect the provisions and the intent of this section.

If a majority of the votes are against the merger, then such merger shall not be effective unless approved by a majority of the qualified voters who vote thereon in a subsequent special election conducted under authority of this section.

Any action or proceeding in any court to set aside a special election held under authority of this section or the result thereof, or to obtain any other relief upon the ground that such election or any proceeding or action taken with respect to the holding of such election is invalid, must be commenced within 30 days after the day of such special election. After the expiration of such period of limitation, no right of action or defense founded upon the invalidity of the election or the result thereof shall be asserted, nor shall the validity of the election or of the result thereof be open to question in any court upon any ground whatever, except in an action or proceeding commenced within such period.

History.

1975, c. 448; 2013-381, s. 10.31; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-codification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled `Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification, in consultation with the State Ethics Commission, the State Board of Elections, the Secretary of State, and the new Bipartisan State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes substituted “163A-1592” for “163-287” in the second paragraph.

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b) and 6.1 repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the change to the reference in this section.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-381, s. 10.31, effective January 1, 2014, added the last sentence at the end of the second paragraph. For applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 162A-78.
Advances by political subdivisions for preliminary expenses of districts.

Any political subdivision is hereby authorized to make advances, from any moneys that may be available for such purpose, in connection with the creation of such district and to provide for the preliminary expenses of such district. Any such advances may be repaid to such political subdivision from the proceeds of bonds issued by such district or from other available funds of the district.

History.

1961, c. 795, s. 28; 1973, c. 822, s. 4.

§ 162A-79.
Article regarded as supplemental.

This Article shall be deemed to provide an additional and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized hereby and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws, and shall not be regarded as in derogation of or as repealing any powers now existing under any other law, either general, special or local; provided, however, that the issuance of bonds under the provisions of this Article need not comply with the requirements of any other law applicable to the issuance of bonds except as herein provided.

History.

1961, c. 795, s. 29; 1973, c. 822, s. 4.

§ 162A-80.
Inconsistent laws declared inapplicable.

All general, special or local laws, or parts thereof, inconsistent herewith are hereby declared to be inapplicable, unless otherwise specified, to the provisions of this Article.

History.

1961, c. 795, s. 30; 1973, c. 822, s. 4.

§ 162A-81.
Adoption and enforcement of ordinances.

A district shall have the same power as a city under

G.S. 160A-175

to assess civil fines and penalties for violation of its ordinances, and may secure injunctions to further insure compliance with its ordinances as provided by this section.

An ordinance may provide that its violation shall subject the offender to a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) to be recovered by the district in a civil action in the nature of debt if the offender does not pay the penalty within a prescribed period of time after he has been cited for violation of the ordinance. Any person assessed a civil penalty by the district shall be notified of the assessment by registered or certified mail, and the notice shall specify the reasons for the assessment. If the person assessed fails to pay the amount of the assessment to the district within 30 days after receipt of notice, or such longer period, not to exceed 180 days, as the district may specify, the district may institute a civil action in the General Court of Justice of the county in which the violation occurred or, in the discretion of the district, in the General Court of Justice of the county in which the person assessed has his or its principal place of business, to recover the amount of the assessment. The validity of the district’s action may be appealed directly to General Court of Justice in the county in which the violation occurred, or may be raised at any time in the action to recover the assessment. Neither failure to contest the district’s action directly nor failure to raise the issue of validity in the action to recover an assessment precludes the other.

An ordinance may provide that it may be enforced by an appropriate equitable remedy issuing from court of competent jurisdiction. In such case, the General Court of Justice shall have jurisdiction to issue such orders as may be appropriate and it shall not be a defense to the application of the district for equitable relief that there is an adequate remedy at law.

Subject to the express terms of an ordinance, a district ordinance may be enforced by any one, all, or a combination of the remedies authorized and prescribed by this section.

An ordinance may provide, when appropriate, that each day’s continuing violation shall be a separate and distinct offense.

History.

1983, c. 333, s. 4.

§§ 162A-82 through 162A-85.

Reserved for future codification purposes.